Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 7. Enforcement of Foreign Judgments

In general. —

Under this article, if not under the full faith and credit clause, it must be considered that a judgment nisi entered by a New Jersey superior court, when filed with the district court, justified any action that could be taken by a judgment plaintiff in a case originating in the state of Wyoming. Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976).

No distinction between monthly payments and fixed sum. —

There is nothing in the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act that distinguishes between a judgment for alimony and support, to be paid in continuing monthly payments, and a judgment for money only, payable in a definite and fixed sum. Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976).

Absent contempt, modification of out-of-state property settlement
improper. —

A district court's modification of a California court's order regarding deposit refund moneys involved in a property settlement, when it found that the wife was not in contempt of court and was fully justified in spending those proceeds, was beyond the court's authority. Haltom v. Haltom, 755 P.2d 876,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act, 72 ALR2d 1255.

Validity, construction, and application of Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act, 31 ALR4th 706.

50 C.J.S. Judgments §§ 888 to 906.

§ 1-17-701.
Short title.

This act means W.S.

1-17-701

through

1-17-707

and may be cited as the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign
Judgments Act.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 71, § 18; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-460, 1-477.8; Laws 1965, ch. 47, § 8; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-701.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition Act, 88 ALR5th 545.

§ 1-17-702.
“Foreign judgment” defined.

In this act, “foreign
judgment” means any judgment, decree, or order of a court of the United
States or of any other court which is entitled to full faith and credit
in this state.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 71, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-461, 1-477.1; Laws 1965, ch. 47, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-702.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see §

1-17-701

.

Quoted

in

Routh v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 952 P.2d 1108,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1998).

§ 1-17-703.
Filing of foreign judgment; effect of filing.

In order for a foreign
judgment to have the same effect as a judgment of a district court
of this state, a copy of any foreign judgment authenticated in accordance
with an act of Congress or the statutes of this state shall be filed
in the office of the clerk of any district court and any county clerk
of this state. The clerk of court shall treat the foreign judgment
as a judgment of the district court of this state notwithstanding
the amount of the judgment or that the action giving rise to the judgment,
if initiated in this state, would be within the jurisdiction of a
minor court. A judgment so filed has the same effect and is subject
to the same procedures, defenses and proceedings for reopening, vacating
or staying as a judgment of a district court of this state and may
be so enforced or satisfied.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 71, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-463, 1-477.2; Laws 1965, ch. 47, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-703; Laws 1980, ch. 25, § 1; Laws 1999, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to modification or vacation of judgment after term, see §§

1-16-401

to

1-16-409

.

As to stay of execution, see §§

1-17-201

to

1-17-210

.

Parties prohibited from reasserting issues. —

Because the parties would be barred from relitigating the issue in Florida as to whether the pleadings requested the relief which had been granted to the wife and the issue which the husband asserted in the Wyoming action was exactly the same issue which he presented to the Florida courts, and the Florida district court of appeal, which was a court of competent jurisdiction, entered a final judgment on the issue, the Wyoming district court properly gave full faith and credit to the Florida judgment. Sandstrom v. Sandstrom, 880 P.2d 103,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. Sept. 13, 1994).

Copy of actual judgment, not related instrument, needed. —

An Ohio municipal court's “certificate of judgment” does not meet the requirement of this section that a “copy” of the foreign judgment be filed, because the “certificate of judgment” is not identical with the original judgment, which Rule 58, Ohio Rules of Civil Procedure, requires to be signed by the judge, but, rather, is a printed form designed to meet Ohio's statutory requirements for the establishment of a lien upon lands of a judgment debtor. Hull v. Buffalo Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 661 P.2d 1049,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 306

(Wyo. 1983).

Limitations period. —

Filing a foreign judgment under the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act does not involve a court proceeding and is thus not a civil action within the clear language of § 1-3-105(a)(iii), and therefore limitation period specified in that section does not apply. Hill v. Value Recovery Group, L.P., 964 P.2d 1256,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1998).

Quoted

in

Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976); Haltom v. Haltom, 755 P.2d 876,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 1-17-704.
Affidavit required; notice of filing; execution.

At the time of filing
a foreign judgment, the judgment creditor or his attorney shall file
with the clerk of court an affidavit setting forth the name and last
known mailing address of the judgment debtor, and the judgment creditor.
The clerk shall promptly mail notice of the filing of the foreign
judgment to the judgment debtor at the address given and shall make
a note of the mailing in the docket. The notice shall include the
name and mailing address of the judgment creditor and the judgment
creditor’s attorney, if any, in this state. The judgment creditor
may mail a notice of the filing of the judgment to the judgment debtor
and may file proof of mailing with the clerk. Lack of notice of filing
by the clerk shall not affect the enforcement proceedings if proof
of mailing by the judgment creditor has been filed. An execution or
other process for enforcement of a foreign judgment shall not issue
until five (5) days after the date the judgment is filed.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 71, §§ 4, 5; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-464, 1-465, 1-477.3; Laws 1965, ch. 47, § 3; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-704.

§ 1-17-705.
Stay of enforcement.

If the judgment debtor
shows the court that an appeal from the foreign judgment is pending
or will be taken, or that a stay of execution has been granted, and
upon proof that the judgment debtor has furnished the security for
satisfaction of the judgment required by the law of the state where
it was rendered, the court shall stay enforcement of the foreign judgment
until the appeal is concluded, the time for appeal expires, or until
the stay of execution expires or is vacated. If the judgment debtor
shows the court any ground upon which enforcement of a judgment of
the court of this state would be stayed, the court shall stay enforcement
of the foreign judgment for an appropriate period, upon requiring
the security for satisfaction of the judgment which is required in
this state.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 71, § 9; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-469, 1-477.4; Laws 1965, ch. 47, § 4; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-705.

Cross references. —

As to stay of execution of domestic judgments, see §§

1-17-201

to

1-17-210

.

Quoted

in

Salmeri v. Salmeri, 554 P.2d 1244,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1976).

§ 1-17-706.
Fees.

Any person filing a foreign
judgment shall pay to the clerk of court the fee for filing instruments
in a civil action under W.S. 5-3-206(a)(i). Fees for docketing, transcription or other enforcement
proceedings shall be the same as for judgments of the courts of this
state.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 47, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 1-477.5; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-706; Laws 1979, ch. 36, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to fees and costs generally, see chapter 14 of this title.

§ 1-17-707.
Right of action unimpaired.

The right of a judgment
creditor to bring an action to enforce his judgment in the appropriate
court in this state instead of proceeding under this act remains unimpaired.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 71, § 16; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-476, 1-477.6; Laws 1965; ch. 47, § 6; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-707; Laws 1980, ch. 25, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see §

1-17-701

.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 19, ch. 71, Laws 1949, repealed all acts or parts of acts inconsistent with that act.

Stated

in

Hull v. Buffalo Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 661 P.2d 1049,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 306

(Wyo. 1983).